Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.343.090

Voluntary change to electoral system.

The school board of directors may authorize a change to its electoral system pursuant to RCW 29A.92.040. Any staggering of directors' terms shall be accomplished as provided in RCW 28A.343.030 and 28A.343.600 through 28A.343.650.

[ 2018 c 113 s 203.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Short title—2018 c 113: See RCW 29A.92.005 and 29A.92.900.